Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-191
Style of ordinance; publication.

The style of
county ordinances shall be: "Be it ordained by the county board of the county
of ...........," and all county ordinances shall, within fifteen days after
they are adopted, be published in some newspaper published or of general circulation
within the county.

Laws 2009, LB532, § 5.